Oklahoma, session 2026, SB322.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2355, as


last amended by Section 1, Chapter 27, 1st Extraordinary Session,


O.S.L. 2023 (68 O.S. Supp. 2024, Section 2355), is amended to read


as follows:


Section 2355. A. Individuals. For all taxable years beginning


after December 31, 1998, and before January 1, 2006, a tax is hereby


imposed upon the Oklahoma taxable income of every resident or


nonresident individual, which tax shall be computed at the option of


the taxpayer under one of the two following methods:

Req. No. 1408 Page 1


1. METHOD 1.


a. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately not deducting federal income tax:


(1) 1/2% tax on first $1,000.00 or part thereof,


(2) 1% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(3) 2% tax on next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(4) 3% tax on next $1,150.00 or part thereof,


(5) 4% tax on next $1,300.00 or part thereof,


(6) 5% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(7) 6% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof, and


(8) (a) for taxable years beginning after December


31, 1998, and before January 1, 2002, 6.75%


tax on the remainder,


(b) for taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2002, and before January 1, 2004,


7% tax on the remainder, and


(c) for taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2004, 6.65% tax on the remainder.


b. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving


spouse to the extent and in the manner that a


surviving spouse is permitted to file a joint return


under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended, and heads of households as defined



Req. No. 1408 Page 2


in the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, not


deducting federal income tax:


(1) 1/2% tax on first $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(2) 1% tax on next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(3) 2% tax on next $2,500.00 or part thereof,


(4) 3% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(5) 4% tax on next $2,400.00 or part thereof,


(6) 5% tax on next $2,800.00 or part thereof,


(7) 6% tax on next $6,000.00 or part thereof, and


(8) (a) for taxable years beginning after December


31, 1998, and before January 1, 2002, 6.75%


tax on the remainder,


(b) for taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2002, and before January 1, 2004,


7% tax on the remainder, and


(c) for taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2004, 6.65% tax on the remainder.


2. METHOD 2.


a. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately deducting federal income tax:


(1) 1/2% tax on first $1,000.00 or part thereof,


(2) 1% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(3) 2% tax on next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(4) 3% tax on next $1,150.00 or part thereof,

Req. No. 1408 Page 3


(5) 4% tax on next $1,200.00 or part thereof,


(6) 5% tax on next $1,400.00 or part thereof,


(7) 6% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(8) 7% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(9) 8% tax on next $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(10) 9% tax on next $3,500.00 or part thereof, and


(11) 10% tax on the remainder.


b. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving


spouse to the extent and in the manner that a


surviving spouse is permitted to file a joint return


under the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended, and heads of households as defined


in the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,


deducting federal income tax:


(1) 1/2% tax on the first $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(2) 1% tax on the next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(3) 2% tax on the next $2,500.00 or part thereof,


(4) 3% tax on the next $1,400.00 or part thereof,


(5) 4% tax on the next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(6) 5% tax on the next $1,600.00 or part thereof,


(7) 6% tax on the next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(8) 7% tax on the next $1,750.00 or part thereof,


(9) 8% tax on the next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(10) 9% tax on the next $6,000.00 or part thereof, and

Req. No. 1408 Page 4


(11) 10% tax on the remainder.


B. Individuals. For all taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2008, and ending any tax year which begins after December


31, 2015, for which the determination required pursuant to Sections


2355.1F and 5 2355.1G of this act title is made by the State Board


of Equalization, a tax is hereby imposed upon the Oklahoma taxable


income of every resident or nonresident individual, which tax shall


be computed as follows:


1. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately:


(a) 1/2% tax on first $1,000.00 or part thereof,


(b) 1% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(c) 2% tax on next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(d) 3% tax on next $1,150.00 or part thereof,


(e) 4% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(f) 5% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(g) 5.50% tax on the remainder for the 2008 tax year and


any subsequent tax year unless the rate prescribed by


subparagraph (h) of this paragraph is in effect, and


(h) 5.25% tax on the remainder for the 2009 and subsequent


tax years. The decrease in the top marginal


individual income tax rate otherwise authorized by


this subparagraph shall be contingent upon the


determination required to be made by the State Board

Req. No. 1408 Page 5


of Equalization pursuant to Section 2355.1A of this


title.


2. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving spouse to


the extent and in the manner that a surviving spouse is permitted to


file a joint return under the provisions of the Internal Revenue


Code of 1986, as amended, and heads of households as defined in the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended:


(a) 1/2% tax on first $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(b) 1% tax on next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(c) 2% tax on next $2,500.00 or part thereof,


(d) 3% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(e) 4% tax on next $2,400.00 or part thereof,


(f) 5% tax on next $2,800.00 or part thereof,


(g) 5.50% tax on the remainder for the 2008 tax year and


any subsequent tax year unless the rate prescribed by


subparagraph (h) of this paragraph is in effect, and


(h) 5.25% tax on the remainder for the 2009 and subsequent


tax years. The decrease in the top marginal


individual income tax rate otherwise authorized by


this subparagraph shall be contingent upon the


determination required to be made by the State Board


of Equalization pursuant to Section 2355.1A of this


title.



Req. No. 1408 Page 6


C. Individuals. For all taxable years beginning on or after


January 1, 2024, a tax is hereby imposed upon the Oklahoma taxable


income of every resident or nonresident individual, which tax shall


be computed as follows:


1. Single individuals and married individuals filing


separately:


(a) 0.25% tax on first $1,000.00 or part thereof,


(b) 0.75% tax on next $1,500.00 or part thereof,


(c) 1.75% tax on next $1,250.00 or part thereof,


(d) 2.75% tax on next $1,150.00 or part thereof,


(e) 3.75% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof, and


(f) 4.75% tax on the remainder.


2. Married individuals filing jointly and surviving spouse to


the extent and in the manner that a surviving spouse is permitted to


file a joint return under the provisions of the Internal Revenue


Code of 1986, as amended, and heads of households as defined in the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended:


(a) 0.25% tax on first $2,000.00 or part thereof,


(b) 0.75% tax on next $3,000.00 or part thereof,


(c) 1.75% tax on next $2,500.00 or part thereof,


(d) 2.75% tax on next $2,300.00 or part thereof,


(e) 3.75% tax on next $4,600.00 or part thereof, and


(f) 4.75% tax on the remainder.



Req. No. 1408 Page 7


No deduction for federal income taxes paid shall be allowed to


any taxpayer to arrive at taxable income.


D. Nonresident aliens. In lieu of the rates set forth in


subsection A above, there shall be imposed on nonresident aliens, as


defined in the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, a tax of


eight percent (8%) instead of thirty percent (30%) as used in the


Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, with respect to the


Oklahoma taxable income of such nonresident aliens as determined


under the provision of the Oklahoma Income Tax Act.


Every payer of amounts covered by this subsection shall deduct


and withhold from such amounts paid each payee an amount equal to


eight percent (8%) thereof. Every payer required to deduct and


withhold taxes under this subsection shall for each quarterly period


on or before the last day of the month following the close of each


such quarterly period, pay over the amount so withheld as taxes to


the Oklahoma Tax Commission, and shall file a return with each such


payment. Such return shall be in such form as the Tax Commission


shall prescribe. Every payer required under this subsection to


deduct and withhold a tax from a payee shall, as to the total


amounts paid to each payee during the calendar year, furnish to such


payee, on or before January 31, of the succeeding year, a written


statement showing the name of the payer, the name of the payee and


the payee’s Social Security account number, if any, the total amount


paid subject to taxation, and the total amount deducted and withheld

Req. No. 1408 Page 8


as tax and such other information as the Tax Commission may require.


Any payer who fails to withhold or pay to the Tax Commission any


sums herein required to be withheld or paid shall be personally and


individually liable therefor to the State of Oklahoma.


E. Corporations. For all taxable years beginning after


December 31, 2021 tax years 2022 through 2024, a tax is hereby


imposed upon the Oklahoma taxable income of every corporation doing


business within this state or deriving income from sources within


this state in an amount equal to four percent (4%) thereof. For tax


year 2025 and subsequent tax years, there shall be no income tax


imposed upon the Oklahoma taxable income of every corporation doing


business within this state or deriving income from sources within


this state.


There shall be no additional Oklahoma income tax imposed on


accumulated taxable income or on undistributed personal holding


company income as those terms are defined in the Internal Revenue


Code of 1986, as amended.


F. Certain foreign corporations. In lieu of the tax imposed in


the first paragraph of subsection D of this section, for all taxable


years beginning after December 31, 2021, there shall be imposed on


foreign corporations, as defined in the Internal Revenue Code of


1986, as amended, a tax of four percent (4%) instead of thirty


percent (30%) as used in the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as


amended, where such income is received from sources within Oklahoma

Req. No. 1408 Page 9


this state, in accordance with the provisions of the Internal


Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, and the Oklahoma Income Tax Act.


Every payer of amounts covered by this subsection shall deduct


and withhold from such amounts paid each payee an amount equal to


four percent (4%) thereof. Every payer required to deduct and


withhold taxes under this subsection shall for each quarterly period


on or before the last day of the month following the close of each


such quarterly period, pay over the amount so withheld as taxes to


the Tax Commission, and shall file a return with each such payment.


Such return shall be in such form as the Tax Commission shall


prescribe. Every payer required under this subsection to deduct and


withhold a tax from a payee shall, as to the total amounts paid to


each payee during the calendar year, furnish to such payee, on or


before January 31, of the succeeding year, a written statement


showing the name of the payer, the name of the payee and the payee’s


Social Security account number, if any, the total amounts paid


subject to taxation, the total amount deducted and withheld as tax,


and such other information as the Tax Commission may require. Any


payer who fails to withhold or pay to the Tax Commission any sums


herein required to be withheld or paid shall be personally and


individually liable therefor to the State of Oklahoma.


G. Fiduciaries. A tax is hereby imposed upon the Oklahoma


taxable income of every trust and estate at the same rates as are


provided in subsection B or C of this section for single

Req. No. 1408 Page 10


individuals. Fiduciaries are not allowed a deduction for any


federal income tax paid.


H. Tax rate tables. For all taxable years beginning after


December 31, 1991, in lieu of the tax imposed by subsection A, B or


C of this section, as applicable there is hereby imposed for each


taxable year on the taxable income of every individual, whose


taxable income for such taxable year does not exceed the ceiling


amount, a tax determined under tables, applicable to such taxable


year which shall be prescribed by the Tax Commission and which shall


be in such form as it determines appropriate. In the table so


prescribed, the amounts of the tax shall be computed on the basis of


the rates prescribed by subsection A, B or C of this section. For


purposes of this subsection, the term “ceiling amount” means, with


respect to any taxpayer, the amount determined by the Tax Commission


for the tax rate category in which such taxpayer falls.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2370, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2370. A. For taxable years beginning after December


31, 2021 tax years 2022 through 2024, for the privilege of doing


business within this state, every state banking association,


national banking association and credit union organized under the


laws of this state, located or doing business within the limits of


the State of Oklahoma this state shall annually pay to this state a



Req. No. 1408 Page 11


privilege tax at the rate of four percent (4%) of the amount of the


taxable income as provided in this section.


B. 1. The privilege tax levied by this section shall be in


addition to the Business Activity Tax levied in Section 1218 of this


title and the franchise tax levied in Article 12 of this title and


in lieu of the tax levied by Section 2355 of this title and in lieu


of all taxes levied by the State of Oklahoma this state, or any


subdivision thereof, upon the shares of stock or personal property


of any banking association or credit union subject to taxation under


this section.


2. Nothing in this section shall be construed to exempt the


real property of any banking associations or credit unions from


taxation to the same extent, according to its value, as other real


property is taxed. Nothing herein shall be construed to exempt an


association from payment of any fee or tax authorized or levied


pursuant to the banking laws.


3. Personal property which is subject to a lease agreement


between a bank or credit union, as lessor, and a nonbanking business


entity or individual, as lessee, is not exempt from personal


property ad valorem taxation. Provided further, that it shall be


the duty of the lessee of such personal property to return sworn


lists or schedules of their taxable property within each county to


the county assessor of such county as provided in Sections 2433 and


2434 of this title.

Req. No. 1408 Page 12


C. Any tax levied under this section shall accrue on the last


day of the taxable year and be payable as provided in Section 2375


of this title. The accrual of such tax for the first taxable year


to which this act the Oklahoma Income Tax Act applies, shall apply


notwithstanding the prior accrual of a tax in the same taxable year


based upon the net income of the next preceding taxable year;


provided, however, any additional deduction enuring to the benefit


of the taxpayer shall be deducted in accordance with the optional


transitional deduction procedures in Section 2354 of this title.


D. The basis of the tax shall be United States taxable income


as defined in paragraph 10 of Section 2353 of this title and any


adjustments thereto under the provisions of Section 2358 of this


title with the following adjustments:


1. There shall be deducted all interest income on obligations


of the United States government and agencies thereof not otherwise


exempted and all interest income on obligations of the State of


Oklahoma this state or political subdivisions thereof, including


public trust authorities, not otherwise exempted under the laws of


this state; and


2. Expense deductions claimed in arriving at taxable income


under paragraph 10 of Section 2353 of this title shall be reduced by


an amount equal to fifty percent (50%) of excluded interest income


on obligations of the United States government or agencies thereof



Req. No. 1408 Page 13


and obligations of the State of Oklahoma this state or political


subdivisions thereof.


E. 1. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph 2 of this


subsection, before January 1, 2017, there shall be allowed a credit


against the tax levied in subsection A of this section in an amount


equal to the amount of taxable income received by a participating


financial institution as defined in Section 90.2 of Title 62 of the


Oklahoma Statutes pursuant to a loan made under the Rural Economic


Development Loan Act. Such credit shall be limited each year to


five percent (5%) of the amount of annual payroll certified by the


Oklahoma Rural Economic Development Loan Program Review Board


pursuant to the provisions of paragraph 3 of subsection B of Section


90.4 of Title 62 of the Oklahoma Statutes with respect to the loan


made by the participating financial institution and may be claimed


for any number of years necessary until the amount of total credits


claimed is equal to the total amount of taxable income received by


the participating financial institution pursuant to the loan. Any


credit allowed but not used in a taxable year may be carried forward


for a period not to exceed five (5) taxable years. In no event


shall a credit allowed pursuant to the provisions of this subsection


be transferable or refundable.


2. No credit otherwise authorized by the provisions of this


subsection may be claimed for any event, transaction, investment,


expenditure or other act occurring on or after July 1, 2010, for

Req. No. 1408 Page 14


which the credit would otherwise be allowable. The provisions of


this paragraph shall cease to be operative on July 1, 2012.


Beginning July 1, 2012, the credit authorized by this subsection may


be claimed for any event, transaction, investment, expenditure or


other act occurring on or after July 1, 2012, according to the


provisions of this subsection.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1408 QD 12/31/2024 12:15:39 PM































Req. No. 1408 Page 15